District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Theatrical Wrestling Regulation Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Boxing and Wrestling Commission Act of 1975, effective October 8, 1975
(D.C. Official Code § 3-601 et seq., D.C. Law 1-20) is amended to read as follows:
(a) Section 3 is amended as follows:
(1) Existing paragraph (1) is designated (1B).
(2) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
“(1A) “Amateur” means an individual who has never participated in a boxing, martial
arts, or professional wrestling event for money, compensation, or reward other than a suitably
inscribed memento.”.
(3) A new paragraph (8A) is added to read as follows:


“(8A) “Theatrical wrestling” means the performance of sports entertainment in which:
“(A) Two or more participants work together in a performance of mock combat
for the purpose of entertainment;
“(B)(i) The outcome is predetermined;
“(ii) performance is choreographed in advance;
“(iii) is noncompetitive; or,
“(iv) participants do not necessarily strive to win; and,
“(C) Takes place in a venue with a total audience capacity of fewer than 2,000
attendees, or as part of a festival or other special event.”.
(b) Section 6(b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) The provisions of this act shall not apply to:
“(1) Amateur wrestling bouts;
“(2) Amateur exhibitions and the amateur participants therein;
“(3) Engagements involving amateur martial arts that are conducted by or held
under the sponsorship any elementary or secondary school or public or private institution of
higher education located in the District of Columbia;
“(4) Amateur boxing; and,
“(5) Theatrical wrestling events.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.


This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.